Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 59.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-159
Noncomplying name of foreign limited
liability company.

(ULLCA
805) (a) A foreign limited liability company whose name does not comply with
section 21-108 may not obtain a certificate of authority until it adopts,
for the purpose of transacting business in this state, an alternate name that
complies with section 21-108. A foreign limited liability company that adopts
an alternate name under this subsection and obtains a certificate of authority
with the alternate name need not comply with any fictitious or assumed name
statute. After obtaining a certificate of authority with an alternate name,
a foreign limited liability company shall transact business in this state
under the alternate name unless the company is authorized under any fictitious
or assumed name statute to transact business in this state under another name.

(b) If a foreign limited
liability company authorized to transact business in this state changes its
name to one that does not comply with section 21-108, it may not thereafter
transact business in this state until it complies with subsection (a) of this
section and obtains an amended certificate of authority.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 59.